Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Offenses.

Sec. 28.35.135.
Unlawful to knowingly make false statement, application, or certification.

A person may not knowingly make a false affidavit, statement, or representation, or affirm falsely with respect to a matter or fact required to be set out under this title, nor may the person use a name other than the person’s true name. A person convicted of violating this section is guilty of unsworn falsification in the second degree and is punishable as prescribed by law.

A person who has a certification, registration, title, license, or other form issued under this title, or who has applied for a certification, registration, license, or other form, and who changes the person’s name or moves from the address shown on the department’s records or forms, shall notify the department of the change in name or address within 30 days

on a form or in a format specified by the department; and

in a manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 43 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 28 ch 23 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For crime of unsworn falsification, see AS

11.56.210

.

Sec. 28.35.140.
Unlawful obstruction or blocking of traffic; duty to yield to following traffic.

A person may not purposely obstruct or block traffic on any roadway by any means. However, a service vehicle such as a bus, garbage truck, tow truck, or ambulance may make brief stops on a roadway, which stops on the roadway are necessary in the performance of its services.

A person operating a motor vehicle at any time on a two-lane roadway outside of an urban area shall pull the motor vehicle off the roadway at the first opportunity to pull over safely if there are five or more motor vehicles immediately following that motor vehicle. A person operating a motor vehicle who violates this subsection is guilty of an infraction as described in AS

28.90.010(d)

and shall be punished by a fine of at least $100.

History.

(§ 50-5-7 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 174 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (b) of this section, “AS

28.90.010(d)

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.050

(d)” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.050

.

Sec. 28.35.145.
Overtaking and passing school bus.

The driver of a vehicle that approaches from any direction a school bus stopped on a highway or vehicular way or area shall stop not less than 30 feet from the school bus before reaching it when there are in operation on the school bus flashing red lights as required by regulation. The driver may not proceed until the school bus proceeds and the flashing lights are no longer illuminated.

When a school bus is stopped on a highway or vehicular way or area, whether or not there are in operation on the school bus flashing red lights as required by regulation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to a person crossing a highway, vehicular way, or area to embark on or disembark from the school bus, whether or not the person is crossing within a marked crosswalk.

The driver of a vehicle on a highway with separate roadways is not required to stop when meeting or passing a school bus that is on a different roadway or, if upon a controlled access highway, when a school bus is stopped off the highway in a loading zone that is part of, or adjacent to, the controlled access highway, and pedestrians are not permitted to cross the highway.

A driver convicted under this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and, in addition to other penalties as provided by law, is subject to a mandatory assessment of six demerit points under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

.

A vehicle owner, or in the case of a leased vehicle a lessee, is guilty of an infraction as described in AS

28.90.010(d)

and may be punished by a fine not to exceed $100, if the vehicle owned or leased by the person is operated in violation of this section. The owner or lessee may not be penalized if the vehicle was stolen, or the driver of the vehicle is convicted under (d) of this section. This subsection does not apply to a lessor of a vehicle if the lessor keeps a record of the name and address of the lessee. A violation of this subsection may not result in the loss of a driver’s license or privilege to drive and does not constitute grounds for assessment of demerit points under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

. This subsection does not prohibit or limit the prosecution of a vehicle driver for violating (a) or (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 76 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (e) of this section, “AS

28.90.010(d)

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.050

(d)” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.050

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The 1987 amendment to this section, providing that the owner or lessee of an offending vehicle will now be guilty of an infraction, would be likely to survive constitutional challenge.
Although generally a person may not be found guilty of an offense unless he or she acts with a “culpable mental state,” AS

11.81.600(b)(2)

provides that no culpable mental state need be proven if the legislature intended to “dispense with” such a requirement, and the legislature so intended here.
June 11, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 28.35.150.
Unlawful to interfere with or destroy official traffic control device or highway construction; action by state for damages. [Repealed, § 25 ch 144 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.35.155.
Operation of vehicle with certain tires prohibited.

It is unlawful to operate a motor vehicle with studded tires or tires with chains attached on a paved highway or road from May 1 through September 15, inclusive, north of 60 North Latitude and from April 15 through September 30, inclusive, south of 60 North Latitude, except that at any latitude on a paved portion of the Sterling Highway a person may not operate a motor vehicle with studded tires or tires with chains attached from May 1 through September 15, inclusive. The commissioner of public safety shall by emergency order provide for additional lawful operating periods based on unusual seasonal or weather conditions. An emergency order adopted under this section is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Upon application, a special individual traction permit may be issued by the Department of Administration allowing the operation of a motor vehicle with studded tires or chains at any time at the discretion of the vehicle owner. The fee for the special individual permit is one-third of the biennial registration fee applicable to that class of vehicle under AS

28.10.421

. The department may provide an appropriate sticker or other device identifying the vehicle to which the permit applies.

In this section, “studded tire” means a tire with metal studs or spikes imbedded in the periphery of the tire surface, and protruding not more than one-fourth inch from the tire surface.

History.

(§ 9 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 29 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 44 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 § 61 (1997))

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions that relate to the amendments to subsection (a) made by § 16, ch. 44, SLA 1996, see § 20, ch. 44, 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 28.35.160.
Unlawful injury to or destruction of traffic regulations or guidance device. [Repealed, § 25 ch 144 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.35.161.
Use of electronic devices while driving; unlawful installation of television, monitor, or similar device.

A person commits the crime of driving while texting, while communicating on a computer, or while a screen device is operating if the person is driving a motor vehicle, and

the vehicle has a television, video monitor, portable computer, or any other similar means capable of providing a visual display that is in full view of a driver in a normal driving position while the vehicle is in motion, and the monitor or visual display is operating while the person is driving; or

the person is reading or typing a text message or other nonvoice message or communication on a cellular telephone, personal data assistant, computer, or any other similar means capable of providing a visual display that is in the view of the driver in a normal driving position while the vehicle is in motion and while the person is driving.

A person may not install or alter equipment described in (a) of this section that allows the images to be viewed by the driver in a normal driving position while the vehicle is in motion.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to

portable cellular telephones or personal data assistants being used for voice communication or displaying caller identification information;

equipment that is displaying only

audio equipment information, functions, and controls;

vehicle information or controls related to speed, fuel level, battery charge, and other vehicle safety or equipment information;

navigation or global positioning;

maps;

visual information to

enhance or supplement the driver’s view forward, behind, or to the sides of the motor vehicle for the purpose of maneuvering the vehicle; or

allow the driver to monitor vehicle occupants seated behind the driver;

vehicle dispatching and response information for motor vehicles providing emergency road service or roadside assistance;

vehicle dispatching information for passenger transport or freight or package delivery;

information for use in performing highway construction, maintenance, or repair or data acquisition by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities or a municipality; or

information for use in performing utility construction, maintenance, repair, or data acquisition by a public utility; in this subparagraph, “public utility” has the meaning given in AS

42.05.990

.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to devices and equipment installed in an emergency vehicle, whether removable or permanently installed, or to the viewing of authorized screen devices by police, fire, or emergency medical service personnel if the user of the equipment or device reasonably believes the information on the device is necessary to respond to a health, safety, or criminal matter. In this subsection, “emergency vehicle” means a police, fire, or emergency medical service vehicle.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (b) of this section that the equipment installed or altered includes a device that, when the motor vehicle is being driven, disables the equipment for all uses except those described in (c) of this section.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of

a violation and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55, unless any of the circumstances described in (2) - (4) of this subsection apply;

a class C felony if the person’s driving causes physical injury to another person;

a class B felony if the person’s driving causes serious physical injury to another person;

a class A felony if the person’s driving causes the death of another person.

A person who violates (b) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2009; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 14 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For statement of purpose relating to the 2012 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 14, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective September 18, 2009, added (c)(2)(I), and made related stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective May 11, 2012, rewrote (a), which read
§(a) A person commits the crime of driving with a screen device operating if

“(1) the person is driving a motor vehicle;

“(2) the vehicle has a television, video monitor, portable computer, or any other similar means capable of providing a visual display that is in full view of a driver in a normal driving position while the vehicle is in motion; and

“(3) the monitor or visual display is operating while the person is driving”;

In (b), substituted “in (a) of this section” for “in (a)(2) of this section”; in (c)(1), substituted “voice communication” for “verbal communication”; and in (d), added the language beginning “whether removable or permanently installed” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (f)(1), substituted “violation and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55” for “class A misdemeanor”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 23, SLA 2016, the 2016 amendments to subsection (f) of this section apply "to violations occurring on or after" July 1, 2016.

Sec. 28.35.170.
Operation with more than three persons in driver’s seat. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.35.175.
Propane gas detector required.

A person may not sell a recreational motor vehicle manufactured after 1990 or rent a recreational motor vehicle to another if the vehicle is equipped with a propane stove or propane heating device unless the vehicle is also equipped with a propane gas detector.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.35.180.
Disobedience to signals of officer regulating traffic prohibited.

A driver of a vehicle may not refuse to obey a lawful order or direction of a peace officer, firefighter, or authorized flagman regulating and directing traffic.
A peace officer or firefighter regulating or directing traffic shall, upon request of a driver, produce evidence of authorization unless the officer or firefighter is wearing in view the badge or uniform of office.

History.

(§ 50-5-11 ACLA 1949; am § 10 ch 241 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Sec. 28.35.182.
Failure to stop at direction of peace officer.

A person commits the offense of failure to stop at the direction of a peace officer in the first degree if the person violates (b) of this section, and, during the commission of that offense,

the person violates AS

28.35.400

;

the person is committing vehicle theft in the first or second degree; or

as a result of the person’s operation or driving, an accident occurs or a person suffers serious physical injury; in this paragraph, “serious physical injury” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

A person commits the offense of failure to stop at the direction of a peace officer in the second degree if the person, while driving or operating a vehicle or motor vehicle or while operating an aircraft or watercraft, knowingly fails to stop as soon as practical and in a reasonably safe manner under the circumstances when requested or signaled to do so by a peace officer.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense, if the peace officer, when requesting or signaling the defendant to stop,

was operating a vehicle, motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, and the vehicle, motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft

did not meet lighting and audible signaling requirements of law for law enforcement vehicles; and

was not marked appropriately so that a reasonable person would recognize it as a law enforcement vehicle; or

was not operating a vehicle, motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, and the peace officer was not wearing the uniform of office or displaying a badge or other symbol of authority so as to be reasonably identifiable as a peace officer.

In this section,

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“signal” means a hand motion, audible mechanical or electronic noise device, visual light device, or combination of them, used in a manner that a reasonable person would understand to mean that the peace officer intends that the person stop.

Failure to stop at the direction of a peace officer in the first degree is a class C felony punishable as provided in AS 12.55. Failure to stop at the direction of a peace officer in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (a)(1) of this section, “AS

28.35.400

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.040

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.35.040

.

Sec. 28.35.185.
Overtaking and passing certain stationary vehicles.

The driver of a vehicle that approaches a stationary emergency vehicle, fire vehicle, law enforcement vehicle, tow truck in the act of picking up a vehicle, vehicle in the act of performing maintenance or road service work, or animal control vehicle being used to perform official duties, when the stationary vehicle is displaying flashing emergency lights on a highway or roadway

with two or more lanes traveling in the same direction, unless otherwise directed by law enforcement or emergency personnel, shall

if possible in the existing safety and traffic conditions, vacate the lane closest to the emergency vehicle, fire vehicle, law enforcement vehicle, tow truck in the act of picking up a vehicle, vehicle in the act of performing maintenance or road service work, or animal control vehicle being used to perform official duties; or

if a lane change under (A) of this paragraph would be impossible, prohibited by law, or unsafe, slow to a reasonable and prudent speed considering the traffic, roadway, and weather conditions;

with fewer than two lanes traveling in the same direction, unless otherwise directed by law enforcement or emergency personnel, shall slow to a reasonable and prudent speed considering the traffic, roadway, and weather conditions.

A person who violates this section is guilty of

a class A misdemeanor if personal injury results from the person’s failure to vacate the lane or slow as required by this section;

an infraction, under circumstances other than in (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 4, 2018, in (a), twice inserted “vehicle in the act of performing maintenance or road service work” following “picking up a vehicle,”.

Sec. 28.35.190.
Penalty for violation of certain sections. [Repealed, § 47 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 28.35.191.
Failure to use headlights.

A person commits the offense of failure to use headlights if the person operates a motor vehicle without the use of motor vehicle headlights

between one half-hour after sunset and one half-hour before sunrise;

at any other time when, because of insufficient light or other atmospheric conditions, persons or motor vehicles are not clearly discernible at a distance of 1,000 feet; or

on a road that is a designated traffic safety corridor under AS

19.10.075

.

A person operating a motor vehicle may not be required to use motor vehicle headlights except as required in (a) of this section.

Failure to use headlights is an infraction.

History.

(§ 99 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 150,
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019 makes this section effective July 1, 2019.

Sec. 28.35.200.
Unlawful operation of vehicles. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.35.210.
Seizure of unsafe or defectively equipped vehicles. [Repealed by implication by AS 28.05.091, enacted by § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.35.220.
Action by state for damages. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.35.225.
Enforcement.

All law enforcement officers in this state and employees of the Department of Public Safety designated by that department’s commissioner shall enforce this title and regulations adopted under this title. The state troopers shall advise and instruct all other law enforcement officers in the state concerning the requirements of this title and regulations adopted under this title.

History.

(§ 11 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 54 SLA 1979; am E.O. No. 99 § 62 (1997))

Sec. 28.35.230.
[Renumbered as AS 28.90.010.]

Sec. 28.35.235.
Unauthorized use of parking reserved for persons with disabilities; penalties.

A person may not park a motor vehicle in a parking place reserved for a person with a disability unless

the person operating the vehicle has a special permit issued by the department under AS

28.10.495

;

the person operating the vehicle has parked the vehicle for the purpose of transporting a person who has a special permit issued by the department under AS

28.10.495

and the person who has the special permit actually exits or enters the vehicle;

the motor vehicle displays a special license plate issued to a person with a disability under AS

28.10.181(d)

and is operated by or used for the purpose of transporting a person with a disability; or

the motor vehicle displays a special license plate or permit issued to persons with disabilities by another state, province, territory, or country and is being operated by or used for the purpose of transporting a person with a disability.

A municipality may enact ordinances necessary to enforce this section.

A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction. Upon conviction, the court shall impose a fine of not less than $125, or, if the person has been previously convicted under this section, the court shall impose a fine of not less than $250. However, a person who violates this section and who was, at the time of the violation, operating a vehicle displaying a special license plate issued under AS

28.10.181(d)

or a special permit issued under AS

28.10.495(a)

shall, upon conviction, pay a fine of $250 or, if the person has been previously convicted under this section, pay a fine of $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1987; am §§ 7, 8 ch 56 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c); relettered in 2002, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (c).

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to enforcement of this section by local law enforcement agencies, see § 1, ch. 56, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 28.35.240.
Duty to obey school patrol. [Repealed, § 3 ch 68 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 28.35.245.
Motorcycle helmet.

A motorcycle helmet may not be manufactured or sold in the state unless the helmet conforms to standards established by regulation by the commissioner of public safety. The regulations must provide for helmets that allow normal peripheral vision and hearing and minimize neck injuries to the wearer potentially caused by the helmet. The regulations shall be adopted under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

A person who is 18 years of age or older may not be required to wear a helmet while operating a motorcycle if the person is the holder of a license or endorsement to operate a motorcycle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 230 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For provisions regulating the manufacture and sale of motorcycle helmets, see AS

28.05.081(c)

.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 192.

Validity of traffic regulations requiring motorcyclists to wear protective headgear, 32 ALR3d 1270.

Sec. 28.35.250.
Application of law. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.35.251.
Failure to contain or confine a load.

A person commits the crime of failure to contain or confine a load in the first degree if the person, with criminal negligence, violates (c) of this section and, as a result of that violation, causes serious physical injury to another person.

A person commits the crime of failure to contain or confine a load in the second degree if the person, with criminal negligence, violates (c) of this section and damages the property of another person in an amount of $5,000 or more.

A person commits the offense of failure to contain or confine a load in the third degree if the person drives or moves a motor vehicle loaded with any material on a highway unless

the load is

contained or confined to prevent the load from

dropping, leaking, or escaping; or

shifting on or within the vehicle to the extent that the motor vehicle’s stability or maneuverability is adversely affected; and

subjected to treatment by methods, approved by the commissioner of public safety by regulation, designed to settle the load or remove loose material before the vehicle is driven or moved on the highway; and

at least six inches of freeboard is maintained around the entire perimeter of a load consisting of sand, gravel, dirt, rock, or similar materials or the load is covered and securely fastened to prevent the cover from becoming loose or detached or from being a hazard to other users of the highway.

This section does not apply to

a vehicle that drops, sprinkles, or sprays sand, liquids, or other materials for the purpose of cleaning or maintaining the highway or providing or improving traction;

a commercial motor vehicle that is subject to the federal motor carrier cargo securement standards implemented through state or federal law;

the natural accumulation of snow, ice, mud, dirt, or similar materials on a motor vehicle;

a vehicle that is removing snow or hauling snow after removal; or

random litter; in this paragraph, “litter” includes plastic wrappers, empty plastic bags, leaves, paper, or similar soft materials.

Failure to contain or confine a load in the

first degree is a class A misdemeanor punishable as provided in AS 12.55;

second degree is a class B misdemeanor punishable as provided in AS 12.55;

third degree is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than

$2,500 if the person has been previously convicted three or more times of a violation of this section;

$1,500 if the person has been previously convicted twice of a violation of this section;

$750 if the person has been previously convicted one time of a violation of this section; or

$300 if the person has not been previously convicted of a violation of this section.

In this section, “criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 99 § 63 (1997); am § 3 ch 107 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective December 23, 2018, rewrote the section.

Sec. 28.35.253.
Anti-spray devices required.

A person may not drive a motor vehicle on a highway unless the vehicle is equipped with fenders, mud flaps, or other anti-spray devices adequate to prevent the vehicle from being a hazard to other users of the highway.

Violation of this section is an infraction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 107 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment effective December 23, 2018, added (b).

Sec. 28.35.255.
Penalty.

History.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 107 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 28.35.260.
[Renumbered as AS 28.90.990.]

Sec. 28.35.261.
Operation of low-speed vehicles.

The operator of a low-speed vehicle is subject to all the traffic and other laws applicable to operators of passenger vehicles.

The operator of a low-speed vehicle may not operate that vehicle on a highway that has a maximum speed limit of more than 35 miles an hour. Notwithstanding this subsection, the operator of a low-speed vehicle may operate that vehicle

on a highway with a maximum speed limit of 45 miles an hour if the highway is

within a municipality that

has a population of less than 35,000;

is not connected by road to Anchorage or Fairbanks; and

has passed an ordinance allowing for the operation of low-speed vehicles as provided for in this subparagraph; or

within an area of the unorganized borough, outside of a city, that is not connected by road to Anchorage or Fairbanks;

across an intersection with a highway that has a maximum speed limit greater than is permissible for low-speed vehicles under this subsection.

Notwithstanding AS

28.01.010

, a municipality may, by ordinance, further restrict the operation of low-speed vehicles within its jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective May 17, 2010, in the introductory language of (b), added “limit” following “maximum speed”, and “operate that vehicle”, added (b)(1), and rewrote (b)(2).

Sec. 28.35.270.
[Renumbered as AS 28.90.995.]